Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2092.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 641. Reduction of School District Debt.-- (a) A school district that received money for a construction project approved by the Department of Education under Article XVII-E.2 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as "The Fiscal Code," before the effective date of this section, shall reduce any debt incurred by the school district in an amount equal to the money received by the school district. (b) A school district that receives money for a construction project approved by the Department of Education under Article 1234567891011121314151617181920 XVII-E.2 of "The Fiscal Code" after the effective date of this section shall use the money to reduce any debt incurred by the school district to pay for the construction project.(c) A school district shall reduce the school district's millage rate as the school district reduces the debt incurred for the project as required under this section. As used in this subsection, the term "project" shall have the meaning given to it in 64 Pa.C.S. § 1504 (relating to definitions) or any project of a school district that is eligible for reimbursement by the Commonwealth as required under subarticle (f) of Article XXV for approved rental or sinking fund charges.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2092PN2688 - 2 - 123456789101112